Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
Article 2 Department of Law

45-15-30.
Created; assistants, deputies, and other personnel; determination of duties, salaries, and promotions; limitation on private practice of law; disclosure requirement for assistant attorney general representing criminal defendant.

There is created a Department of Law with the Attorney General at the head thereof and with such numbers of deputy attorneys general, assistant attorneys general, special assistant attorneys general, other attorneys, paraprofessional personnel, and other employees or independent contractors as the Attorney General shall deem necessary to carry out the functions of the Attorney General and the Department of Law. The Attorney General is authorized to determine the title and to change the title of any attorney or other employee of the Department of Law or any attorney at law under independent contract to the Department of Law in order to define the duties and responsibilities of any attorney or other employee of the said department and to establish salaries and effect promotions of any such attorney or other employee of the said department, except that those positions in the department which are within the classified service on April 18, 1975, shall be covered by the procedures prescribed by the State Personnel Board. Neither the Attorney General nor any other attorney at law employed full time by the Department of Law shall engage in the private practice of law during his or her term of appointment. Attorneys at law under independent contract to the Department of Law may engage in the private practice of law even though they may have been appointed or designated either specially or generally as assistant attorneys general or attorneys. Notwithstanding that any attorney at law under independent contract to the Department of Law has been appointed or designated either specially or generally as an assistant attorney general and thus is identified with the State of Georgia as its representative for cases arising within the scope of that appointment or designation, representation of a defendant in criminal proceedings by that assistant attorney general shall not constitute a conflict of interest if that assistant attorney general provides written disclosure of such appointment or designation to the defendant prior to accepting employment by that defendant or, when a court has appointed an assistant attorney general to represent an indigent criminal defendant, disclosures to the defendant and to the court, to be reflected in the record of that court, such appointment or designation as assistant attorney general.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 284, § 2; Ga. L. 1947, p. 673, § 1; Ga. L. 1961, p. 131, § 1; Ga. L. 1966, p. 43, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 879, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1359, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 1/SB 97; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-74/HB 642.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

45-15-31.
Appointment, compensation, and removal of assistant and deputy attorneys general and law assistants.

All assistant attorneys general, deputy assistant attorneys general, and law assistants shall be appointed by the Attorney General for such periods of time as he deems advisable. The compensation of all assistant attorneys general, deputy assistant attorneys general, law assistants, and other employees of the Department of Law shall be established by the Attorney General, except that those employees under the merit system shall be compensated according to the laws and rules and regulations of said system. Any assistant attorney general, deputy assistant attorney general, law assistant, or other employee not under the merit system may be removed by the Attorney General.

The term “assistant attorney general,” wherever it may appear in the laws of this state, shall be understood to include the term “deputy attorney general” so that a deputy attorney general, when duly appointed by the Attorney General, may perform any duty otherwise prescribed by law or regulation to be performed by an assistant attorney general.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 284, § 3; Ga. L. 1950, p. 225, § 1; Ga. L. 1961, p. 131, § 3; Ga. L. 1966, p. 43, § 2; Ga. L. 1967, p. 102, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 879, § 3.

45-15-32.
Employment of clerical assistants for department.

The Attorney General as the head of the Department of Law is authorized and directed to employ such clerical assistants as may from time to time be needed.

History.

Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, § 93; Code 1933, § 40-1611.

45-15-33.
Employees of department not to receive remuneration of any kind or reimbursement other than provided by article; exception.

Except as provided in this article, no employee of the Department of Law shall be entitled to or authorized to receive any salary, fee, compensation, or other remuneration of any type, nor shall he be entitled to the reimbursement of expenses from any other state department, agency, commission, board, authority, bureau, or any other legislative, judicial, or executive body of state government; provided, however, that nothing contained in this Code section shall apply to or be construed to exclude or prohibit the payments provided for in paragraph (4) of subsection (a) of Code Section 32-2-2.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 102, § 2.

45-15-34.
Department as exclusive authority for executive branch in law matters.

The Department of Law is vested with complete and exclusive authority and jurisdiction in all matters of law relating to the executive branch of the government and every department, office, institution, commission, committee, board, and other agency thereof. Every department, office, institution, commission, committee, board, and other agency of the state government is prohibited from employing counsel in any manner whatsoever unless otherwise specifically authorized by law.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 284, § 4; Ga. L. 1966, p. 43, § 3.

45-15-35.
Power of Governor to direct institution of proceedings and litigation by department.

The Governor shall have the power to direct the Department of Law, through the Attorney General as head thereof, to institute and prosecute in the name of the state such matters, proceedings, and litigations as he shall deem to be in the best interest of the people of the state.

History.

Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, § 92; Code 1933, § 40-1610.

Cross references.

Duty of Governor to provide for defense of actions against state or other actions involving claim inconsistent with state’s sovereignty, jurisdiction, or rights, §

45-12-26

.

Law reviews.

For note, “Perdue v. Baker: Who Has the Ultimate Power over Litigation on Behalf of the State of Georgia — the Governor or the Attorney General?,” see
21 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 751 (2005).

45-15-35.1.
[Repealed] Governor’s power to seek preclearance of any change affecting voting pursuant to Section 5 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-15-35.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 914, § 37/HB 540; repealed by Ga. L. 2015, p. 385, § 6-7/HB 252, effective July 1, 2015.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 385, § 1-1/HB 252, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘J. Calvin Hill, Jr., Act.’ ”

45-15-36.
Reimbursement of department by other state agencies for litigation expenses; submission to agency of statement of expenses.

When the Attorney General shall undertake the trial or preparation for trial of any action on behalf of any state department, agency, commission, board, authority, bureau, or any other legislative, judicial, or executive body of the state, such state agency involved is authorized and directed to reimburse the Department of Law for actual expenses incurred for court costs, filing costs, witness fees, costs of reporting and preparing transcripts of records, costs for depositions, interrogatories, and other methods of discovery, and any other expenses incurred for such services, except salaries, expenses, and subsistence allowances paid regular employees of the Department of Law.

From time to time the Attorney General shall submit to the state agency involved a statement of the expenses of such trial or trial preparation incurred by the Department of Law, such statements to include detailed, itemized statements of the costs thereof as contemplated by this Code section; and, notwithstanding any other provision of law, the state agency involved is authorized and directed to reimburse the Department of Law for such expenses from funds appropriated to or available to such state agency.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 104, §§ 1, 2.

45-15-37.
Reimbursement of department by state retirement systems or Board of Workers’ Compensation for services; statement of expenses; advance approval of services.

As used in this Code section, the term “state retirement systems” means the following retirement systems: Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia, Teachers Retirement System of Georgia, Public School Employees Retirement System, and Trial Judges and Solicitors Retirement Fund.

When the Attorney General shall assign any assistant attorney general, deputy assistant attorney general, special deputy assistant attorney general, or attorney to perform specific legal services requested by the State Board of Workers’ Compensation or by any state retirement system, the State Board of Workers’ Compensation or the state retirement system requesting such services shall reimburse the Department of Law for such services, as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section.

From time to time the Attorney General shall submit to the State Board of Workers’ Compensation or to the state retirement systems requesting legal services a statement of the expenses of such legal services incurred by the Department of Law, such statements to include the names of the assistant attorneys general, deputy assistant attorneys general, special deputy assistant attorneys general, or attorneys performing such services; the items of legal services performed; and the costs thereof. The State Board of Workers’ Compensation and the state retirement systems are authorized to reimburse the Department of Law for such services and expenses; provided, however, that the amount of such services and expenses shall have the advance approval of the director of the State Board of Workers’ Compensation and the state retirement systems requesting such services.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 810, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45.